Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.041

Narcotic drugs, controlled substances, alcohol, cannabis, other intoxicant, cell phone, or other form of electronic telecommunications device—Possession, etc., by prisoners—Penalty.

(1) Every person serving a sentence in any state correctional institution who, without legal authorization, while in the institution or while being conveyed to or from the institution, or while under the custody or supervision of institution officials, officers, or employees, or while on any premises subject to the control of the institution, knowingly possesses or carries upon his or her person or has under his or her control any narcotic drug or controlled substance, as defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, alcohol, cannabis, or other intoxicant, or a cell phone or other form of an electronic telecommunications device, is guilty of a class C felony.

(2) Every person confined in a county or local correctional institution who, without legal authorization, while in the institution or while being conveyed to or from the institution, or while under the custody or supervision of institution officials, officers, or employees, or while on any premises subject to the control of the institution, knowingly possesses or has under his or her control any narcotic drug or controlled substance, as defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, alcohol, cannabis, or other intoxicant, or a cell phone or other form of an electronic telecommunications device, is guilty of a class C felony.

(3) The sentence imposed under this section shall be in addition to any sentence being served.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

[ 2022 c 16 s 3; 2016 c 199 s 1; 1995 c 314 s 5; 1979 c 121 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.